Louisiana, session 2026, HB779.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1121.6(A), (B), and (C)(introductory paragraph) are hereby
amended and reenacted and R.S. 40:1121.6(F) and (G) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1121.6. Expedited partner therapy
A. The purpose of this Section is to allow for the provision of medications
or prescriptions by any physician licensed to practice medicine in this state or any
advanced practice registered nurse who is licensed to practice nursing in this state,
or any physician assistant, who is licensed to practice in this state, provided such
physician or nurse or physician assistant has the authority to write prescriptions in
this state, to individuals who may have been exposed to gonorrhea or chlamydia.
gonorrhea, chlamydia, trichomoniasis, or other sexually associated infection, as
determined by the Louisiana Department of Health. Expedited partner therapy is
hereby authorized absent a doctor-patient relationship and absent clinical assessment.
B. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, any
physician or any advanced practice registered nurse who diagnoses or does a nurse
clinical assessment or any physician assistant who performs an examination of a case
of chlamydia or gonorrhea gonorrhea, chlamydia, trichomoniasis, or other sexually
associated infection, as determined by the Louisiana Department of Health in an
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 779 ENROLLED
individual patient may prescribe, furnish, or otherwise provide prescription antibiotic
drugs to that patient's sexual partner or partners absent a doctor-patient relationship
or absent an advanced practice registered nurse-patient relationship and without
examination or nurse clinical assessment or physician assistant examination of that
patient's sexual partner or partners.
C. If expedited partner therapy is chosen as an alternative, the patient with
a case of chlamydia or gonorrhea gonorrhea, chlamydia, trichomoniasis, or other
sexually associated infection, as determined by the Louisiana Department of Health
will be given a written document that he agrees to give to his sexual contact. The
document will contain, but will not be limited to, the following information:
* * *
F. A physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant
who reasonably and in good faith renders expedited partner therapy in accordance
with this Section and a pharmacist who reasonably and in good faith dispenses drugs
in accordance with this Section shall not be subject to civil or criminal liability or be
deemed to have engaged in unprofessional conduct.
G. The Louisiana Department of Health shall create a list of sexually
associated infections that are eligible for expedited partner therapy.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.